Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.95.090

Advanced college tuition payment program—Discontinuation—Use of units—Refunds.

(1) In the event that the legislature determines that the advanced college tuition payment program is not financially feasible, or for any other reason, the legislature may declare the discontinuance of the program. At the time of such declaration, the governing body will cease to accept any further tuition unit contracts or purchases.

(2) The remaining tuition units for all beneficiaries who have either enrolled in higher education or who are within four years of graduation from a secondary school shall be honored until such tuition units have been exhausted, or for ten fiscal years from the date that the program has been discontinued, whichever comes first. All other contract holders shall receive a refund equal to the value of the current tuition units in effect at the time that the program was declared discontinued.

(3) At the end of the ten-year period, any tuition units remaining unused by currently active beneficiaries enrolled in higher education shall be refunded at the value of the current tuition unit in effect at the end of that ten-year period.

(4) At the end of the ten-year period, all other funds remaining in the account not needed to make refunds or to pay for administrative costs shall be deposited to the state general fund.

(5) The governing body may make refunds under other exceptional circumstances as it deems fit, however, no tuition units may be honored after the end of the tenth fiscal year following the declaration of discontinuance of the program.

[ 2016 c 69 s 12; 2005 c 272 s 3; 1997 c 289 s 9.]